Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.180

Denial, suspension, revocation of licenses, probationary orders—Findings and conclusions—Record.

The director shall hear and determine the charges, make findings and conclusions upon the evidence produced, and file them in his or her office, together with a record of all of the evidence, and serve upon the accused a copy of such findings and conclusions.

[ 2011 c 336 s 576; 1959 c 139 s 18.]